Mississippi, session 2026, HB194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the State Department of Education, in conjunction with the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning and the Department of Human Services shall establish and implement a program known as the "African-American Male Success Academy" for public school students in kindergarten through Grade 8.  In addition to assisting practitioners, teachers and school leaders to recognize, understand, and cultivate the diversity of social skills and school success of young African-American male students in the early grades, the academy shall illustrate, through a culturally responsive and strengths-based approach to instruction, what is lost when this demographic of students is prevented from free participation in boyhood without the demands placed upon them to attend to adult and peer interactions and attitudes. (2)  The academy established under subsection (1) of this section shall be structured for one (1) semester of instruction that is age and grade appropriate for students in kindergarten through Grade 8.  The lecture-based portions of instruction in the academy must be conducted by culturally competent instructors with adequate certification in cognitive and social-emotional development and behaviors who are licensed by the State Department of Education or who teach those subject areas at the collegiate level. (3)  The African-American Male Success Academy must include, but not be limited to, the following instructional components: (a)  An orientation, which the parents are encouraged to attend; (b)  Classes in social studies that affirm the experiences of adolescent African-American males, which incorporate books, visuals and other materials that reflect the richness of the histories, lives and points of view of African-American men and their contributions to shaping social change through their advocacy and personal sacrifices made for the causes of social justice and equity; (c)  African-American literature and artistic expression; (d)  Instructional interaction with authority figures in the home, school and community, including: (i)  Caregivers; (ii)  Educators; (iii) School administrators; (iv)  Law enforcement officers; and (v)  First responders; (e)  Presentations from community partners; (f)  Access to mental health professional for evaluations and assistance in response to traumatic events; (g)  Instruction that avoids the effects of unconscious biases by honoring and valuing the cultural and personal identities of all children; (h)  Strengths-based approaches to readiness for life, academic and career success; and (i)  For students in middle school grades, additional components shall consist of: (i)  Facilitation of social interaction with peers and goal orientation to college completion; (ii)  Positive youth development grounded in an ethic of care and love; and (iii)  Create a pathway to college entrance through early exposure to academic and career options, faculty mentoring and integration into college life. (4)  Students participating in the academy must complete a series of tasks designed to enhance their ability to overcome traditional barriers to academic achievement, to develop racial pride and self-awareness and develop scholar identity-view of self as intellectual. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.